North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-56 Children’s Services Coordinating Committee [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 373, § 4, effective August 1, 2017.

54-56-01.
Children’s services coordinating committee — Membership. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 681, § 1; 1991, ch. 592, § 44; 1991, ch. 636, § 1; 1991, ch. 714, § 20; 1993, ch. 62, § 17; 1993, ch. 539, § 1; 1997, ch. 43, § 9; 1997, ch. 51, § 39; 2003, ch. 138, § 95; repealed by 2017, ch. 373, § 4, effective August 1, 2017.

54-56-02.
Staff — Support services. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 681, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 373, § 4, effective August 1, 2017.

54-56-03.
Functions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 681, § 3; 1995, ch. 502, § 2; 1997, ch. 43, § 10; 2005, ch. 534, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 373, § 4, effective August 1, 2017.

54-56-04.
Charter public corporations — Duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 681, § 4; 1991, ch. 98, § 45; 1995, ch. 502, § 3; 1997, ch. 43, § 11; 2005, ch. 534, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 373, § 4, effective August 1, 2017.

54-56-05.
Authority to accept and expend funds, grants, or gifts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 43, § 13.

54-56-06.
Regional or tribal children’s services coordinating committee — Functions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 43, § 12; 2003, ch. 14, § 6; 2005, ch. 534, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 373, § 4, effective August 1, 2017.

54-56-07.
Operating fund balance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 534, § 4.